Georgia, session 2025_26, HB733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 733
- 1 -

25 LC 52 0818
18 SECTION 1.
19 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Insurance Consumer and
20 Policyholder Advocacy Act."
21 SECTION 2.
22 The purpose of this Act is to protect insurance consumers and policyholders by ensuring
23 fairness and transparency in insurance practices, addressing unjustified rate increases,
24 enhancing industry oversight, and providing education and advocacy for insurance
25 consumers and policyholders.
26 SECTION 3.
27 Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to insurance, is amended in
28 Chapter 2, relating to department and Commissioner, by revising Code Section 33-2-4, which
29 is reserved, as follows:
30 "33-2-4.
31 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
32 (1) 'Insurance consumer' means any individual or person in this state that entered into a
33 contract for a product or service from an insurer or licensee under the jurisdiction of the
34 Commissioner.
35 (2) 'Insurance consumer and policyholder advocate' or 'advocate' means an individual
36 employed in the department to represent the interests of insurance consumers and
37 policyholders in insurance matters.
38 (3) 'Policyholder' means a person in this state who is or was an owner, insured, covered
39 person, beneficiary, or person designated as responsible for payment under an insurance
40 policy, certificate of insurance, or annuity contract provided by an insurer.
41 (b) There is established within the office of the Commissioner the position of insurance
42 consumer and policyholder advocate. The advocate shall:
H. B. 733
- 2 -

25 LC 52 0818
43 (1) Review insurer practices related to policy cancellations and nonrenewals for fairness
44 to insurance consumers and policyholders and investigate any policy cancellations or
45 nonrenewals at the request of an insurance consumer or policyholder;
46 (2) Participate in rate approval processes and advocate on behalf of insurance consumers
47 and policyholders in such processes and any subsequent hearings;
48 (3) Implement state-wide campaigns, conduct stakeholder meetings, publish materials,
49 and provide online tools to educate insurance consumers and policyholders on the risks
50 and benefits of different types of insurance, including but not limited to health, life,
51 automobile, property, and flood, to ensure insurance consumers and policyholders can
52 make informed decisions; and
53 (4) Perform such other functions necessary to advocate for insurance consumers and
54 policyholders.
55 (c) The advocate shall be entitled to appear, as a party or otherwise, on behalf of insurance
56 consumers and policyholders in any proceedings before the Commissioner, in
57 administrative proceedings related to violations of provisions in this title, and in judicial
58 proceedings appealing an act by the Commissioner.
59 (d) The Commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement
60 the provisions of this Code section. Reserved."
61 SECTION 4.
62 Said title is further amended in said chapter by adding a new subsection to Code Section
63 33-2-17, relating to conduct of hearings by Commissioner generally and demands for
64 hearing, to read as follows:
65 "(e) The insurance consumer and policyholder advocate is authorized to request a hearing
66 and to participate in any hearing held pursuant to this Code section."
H. B. 733
- 3 -

25 LC 52 0818
67 SECTION 5.
68 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-2-26, relating to
69 persons entitled to appeal and procedure generally, as follows:
70 "33-2-26.
71 An appeal from the Commissioner shall be taken only from an order on hearing or with
72 respect to a matter as to which the Commissioner has refused or failed to grant or hold a
73 hearing after demand therefor under Code Section 33-2-17 or as to a matter as to which the
74 Commissioner has refused or failed to make his order on hearing as required by Code
75 Section 33-2-23. Any The insurance consumer and policyholder advocate and any person
76 who was a party to the hearing or whose pecuniary interests are directly and immediately
77 affected by the refusal or failure to grant a hearing and who is aggrieved by the order,
78 refusal, or failure may appeal from the order on hearing or as to any such matter within 30
79 days after:
80 (1) The order on hearing has been mailed or delivered to the persons entitled to receive
81 the same;
82 (2) The Commissioner's order denying rehearing or reargument has been so mailed or
83 delivered;
84 (3) The Commissioner has refused or failed to make his order on hearing as required
85 under Code Section 33-2-23; or
86 (4) The Commissioner has refused or failed to grant or hold a hearing as required under
87 Code Section 33-2-17."
88 SECTION 6.
89 Said title is further amended in Chapter 9, relating to regulation of rates, underwriting rules,
90 and related organizations, by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 33-9-1, relating to
91 purpose and construction of chapter, as follows:
H. B. 733
- 4 -

25 LC 52 0818
92 "(a) The purpose of this chapter is to promote the public welfare by regulating insurance
93 rates as provided in this chapter to the end that they shall not be excessive, inadequate, or
94 unfairly discriminatory to insurance consumers or policyholders, shall not be unjustifiably
95 increased, and shall be subject to an open and transparent review process; to authorize the
96 existence and operation of qualified rating organizations and advisory organizations and
97 require that specified rating services of such rating organizations be generally available to
98 all admitted insurers; and to authorize cooperation between insurers in rate making and
99 other related matters."
100 SECTION 7.
101 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-9-2, relating to
102 definitions, as follows:
103 "33-9-2.
104 As used in this chapter, the term:
105 (1) 'Advisory organization' means every person other than an admitted insurer, whether
106 located within or outside this state, who prepares policy forms or makes underwriting
107 rules incident to but not including the making of rates, rating plans, or rating systems, or
108 who collects and furnishes to admitted insurers or rating organizations loss or expense
109 statistics or other statistical information and data and acts in an advisory, as distinguished
110 from a rate-making, capacity. No duly authorized attorney at law acting in the usual
111 course of his profession shall be deemed to be an advisory organization.
112 (2) 'Insurance consumer' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
113 Section 33-2-4.
114 (3) 'Insurance consumer and policyholder advocate' or 'advocate' shall have the same
115 meaning as set forth in Code Section 33-2-4.
116 (2)(4) 'Member' means an insurer who participates in or is entitled to participate in the
117 management of a rating, advisory, or other organization.
H. B. 733
- 5 -

25 LC 52 0818
118 (5) 'Policyholder' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 33-2-4.
119 (3)(6) 'Rating organization' means every person other than an admitted insurer, whether
120 located within or outside this state, who has as his object or purpose the making of rates,
121 rating plans, or rating systems. Two or more admitted insurers who act in concert for the
122 purpose of making rates, rating plans, or rating systems and who do not operate within
123 the specific authorizations contained in Code Sections 33-9-6, 33-9-7, 33-9-11, 33-9-20,
124 and 33-9-22 shall be deemed to be a rating organization. No single insurer shall be
125 deemed to be a rating organization.
126 (4)(7) 'Subscriber' means an insurer which is furnished at its request with rates and rating
127 manuals by a rating organization of which it is not a member, or with advisory services
128 by an advisory organization of which it is not a member."
129 SECTION 8.
130 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-9-4, relating to
131 standards applicable to making and use of rates, as follows:
132 "33-9-4.
133 The following standards shall apply to the making and use of rates pertaining to all classes
134 of insurance to which this chapter is applicable:
135 (1) Rates shall not be excessive, or inadequate, as defined in this Code section, nor shall
136 they be or unfairly discriminatory to insurance consumers or policyholders;
137 (2) No rate shall be held to be excessive unless such rate is unreasonably high for the
138 insurance provided and a reasonable degree of competition does not exist in the area with
139 respect to the classification to which such rate is applicable; provided, however, with
140 respect to rate filings involving an increase in rates, no rate for personal private passenger
141 motor vehicle insurance shall be held to be excessive unless such rate is unreasonably
142 high for the insurance provided and a reasonable degree of competition does not exist;
H. B. 733
- 6 -

25 LC 52 0818
143 (3) No rate shall be held inadequate unless it is unreasonably low for the insurance
144 provided and continued use of it would endanger solvency of the insurer, or unless the
145 use of such rate by the insurer using such rate has, or will, if continued, tend to destroy
146 competition or create a monopoly;
147 (3.1) No rate shall be unjustifiably increased, and any rate filing that results in an overall
148 rate increase of 10 percent or more within a 12 month period shall be subject to an
149 examination and an open and transparent review process as set forth in this chapter;
150 (4) Consideration shall be given to the extent applicable to past and prospective loss
151 experience within and outside this state, to conflagration and catastrophe hazards, to a
152 reasonable margin for underwriting profit and contingencies, to past and prospective
153 expenses both country wide and those specially applicable to this state, to the insurer's
154 average yield from investment income, and to all other factors, including judgment
155 factors, deemed relevant within and outside this state; and, in the case of fire insurance
156 rates, consideration may be given to the experience of the fire insurance business during
157 the most recent five-year period;
158 (5) Consideration may also be given, in the making and use of rates, to dividends,
159 savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or returned by insurers to their
160 policyholders, members, or subscribers;
161 (6) The systems of expense provisions included in the rates for use by any insurer or
162 group of insurers may differ from those of other insurers or groups of insurers to reflect
163 the operating methods of any such insurer or group with respect to any kind of insurance
164 or with respect to any subdivision or combination thereof;
165 (7) Risks may be grouped by classifications for the establishment of rates and minimum
166 premiums. Classification rates may be modified to produce rates for individual risks in
167 accordance with rating plans which establish standards for measuring variations in
168 hazards or expense provisions, or both. Such standards may measure any difference
169 among risks that have a probable effect upon losses or expenses. Classifications or
H. B. 733
- 7 -

25 LC 52 0818
170 modifications of classifications of risks may be established based upon size, expense,
171 management, individual experience, location or dispersion of hazard, or any other
172 reasonable considerations. Such classifications and modifications shall apply to all risks
173 under the same or substantially the same circumstances or conditions; provided, however,
174 the Commissioner shall establish the maximum amount of any such modification;
175 (8) Nothing contained in this Code section or elsewhere in this chapter shall be construed
176 to repeal or modify Chapter 6 of this title, relating to unfair trade practices, and any rate,
177 rating classification, rating plan or schedule, or variation thereof established in violation
178 of Chapter 6 of this title shall, in addition to the consequences stated in Chapter 6 of this
179 title or elsewhere, be deemed violative of to violate his Code section;
180 (9) No insurer shall base any standard or rating plan on vehicle insurance, in whole or
181 in part, directly or indirectly, upon race, creed, or ethnic extraction; and
182 (10) No insurer shall base any standard or rating plan on vehicle insurance, in whole or
183 in part, directly or indirectly, upon any physical disability of an insured unless the
184 disability directly impairs the ability of the insured to drive a motor vehicle."
185 SECTION 9.
186 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-9-21, relating to
187 maintenance and filing rates, rating plans, rating systems, or underwriting rules and
188 examination of claim reserve practices by the Commissioner, as follows:
189 "33-9-21.
190 (a) Every insurer shall maintain with the Commissioner copies of the rates, rating plans,
191 rating systems, underwriting rules, and policy or bond forms used by it. The maintenance
192 of rates, rating plans, rating systems, underwriting rules, and policy or bond forms with the
193 Commissioner by a licensed rating organization of which an insurer is a member or
194 subscriber will be sufficient compliance with this Code section for any insurer maintaining
195 membership or subscriberships in such organization, to the extent that the insurer uses the
H. B. 733
- 8 -

25 LC 52 0818
196 rates, rating plans, rating systems, underwriting rules, and policy or bond forms of such
197 organization; provided, however, that the Commissioner, when he or she deems it
198 necessary, without compliance with the rule-making procedures of this title or Chapter 13
199 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act':
200 (1) May require any domestic, foreign, and alien insurer to file the required rates, rating
201 plans, rating systems, underwriting rules, and policy or bond forms used independent of
202 any filing made on its behalf or as a member of a licensed rating organization, as the
203 Commissioner shall deem to be necessary to ensure compliance with the standards of this
204 chapter and Code Section 34-9-130 and for the best interests of the citizens of this state;
205 (2) Shall require each domestic, foreign, and alien insurer, writing or authorized to write
206 workers' compensation insurance in this state, to file such insurer's own individual rate
207 filing for rates to be charged for workers' compensation insurance coverage written in this
208 state. Such rates shall be developed and established after consultation with the State
209 Board of Workers' Compensation based upon each individual insurer's experience in the
210 State of Georgia to the extent actuarially credible. The experience filed shall include the
211 loss ratios, reserves, reserve development information, expenses, including commissions
212 paid and dividends paid, investment income, pure premium data adjusted for loss
213 development and loss trending, profits, and all other data and information used by that
214 insurer in formulating its workers' compensation rates which are used in this state and any
215 other information or data required by the Commissioner. In establishing and maintaining
216 loss reserves, no workers' compensation insurer shall be allowed to maintain any excess
217 loss reserve for any claim or potential claim for more than 90 days after the amount of
218 liability for such claim or potential claim has been established, whether by final
219 judgment, by settlement agreement, or otherwise. This limitation on the maintenance of
220 loss reserves shall be enforced through this Code section, as well as through Code
221 Section 33-9-23, relating to examination of admitted insurers, and any other appropriate
222 enforcement procedures. The Commissioner is authorized to accept such rate
H. B. 733
- 9 -

25 LC 52 0818
223 classifications as are reasonable and necessary for compliance with this chapter. A rate
224 filing required by this paragraph shall be updated by the insurer at least once every two
225 years; and
226 (3) As used in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the term 'excess loss reserve' means any
227 reserve amount in excess of the reserve required by law.
228 (b) Any domestic, foreign, or alien insurer that is authorized to write insurance in this state
229 must shall file with the Commissioner any rate, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting
230 rule for all personal private passenger motor vehicle insurance:
231 (1) For private passenger motor vehicle insurance providing only the mandatory
232 minimum limits required by Code Section 33-34-4 and subsection (a) of Code
233 Section 40-9-37, and no such rate, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting rule shall
234 become effective, nor may any premium be collected by any insurer thereunder, unless
235 the filing has been received by the Commissioner in his or her office and such filing has
236 been approved by the Commissioner or a period of 45 60 days has elapsed from the date
237 such filing was received by the Commissioner during which time such filing has not been
238 disapproved by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall be authorized to extend such
239 45 60 day period by no more than 55 40 days at his or her discretion. If a filing is
240 disapproved, notice of such disapproval order shall be given within 100 days of receipt
241 of filing by the Commissioner, specifying in what respects such filing fails to meet the
242 requirements of this chapter. The filer shall be given a hearing upon written request made
243 within 30 days after the issuance of the disapproval order, and such hearing shall
244 commence within 30 days after such request unless postponed by mutual consent. Such
245 hearing, once commenced, may be postponed or recessed by the Commissioner only for
246 weekends, holidays, or after normal working hours or at any time by mutual consent of
247 all parties to the hearing. The Commissioner may also, at his or her discretion, recess any
248 hearing for not more than two recess periods of up to 15 consecutive days each. In
249 connection with any hearing or judicial review with respect to the approval or disapproval
H. B. 733
- 10 -

25 LC 52 0818
250 of such rates, the burden of persuasion shall fall upon the affected insurer or insurers to
251 establish that the challenged rates are adequate, not excessive, and not unfairly
252 discriminatory, and not unjustifiably increased. After such a hearing, the Commissioner
253 must shall affirm, modify, or reverse his or her previous action within the time period
254 provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 33-2-23 relative to orders of the
255 Commissioner. The requirement of approval or disapproval of a rate filing by the
256 Commissioner under this subsection shall not prohibit actions by the Commissioner
257 regarding compliance of such rate filing with the requirements of Code Section 33-9-4
258 brought after such approval or disapproval.
259 (2) For personal private passenger motor vehicle insurance other than that described in
260 paragraph (1) of this subsection, such rate, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting rule
261 for all such personal private passenger motor vehicle insurance shall be effective 60 days
262 after such filing and shall be implemented without approval of the Commissioner, unless
263 an earlier effective date is authorized by the Commissioner or a later effective date is
264 specified by the insurer. This paragraph shall apply to the entire personal private
265 passenger motor vehicle insurance policy with limits above the mandatory minimum
266 required by Code Section 33-34-4 and subsection (a) of Code Section 40-9-37 and shall
267 apply to the entire personal private passenger motor vehicle policy with minimum limits
268 if such policy has any additional nonmandatory coverage or coverages.
269 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, an
270 insurer may, but shall not be required to, file its rate, rating plan, rating system, or
271 underwriting rule for all such personal private passenger motor vehicle insurance
272 provided for in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection under the filing process of
273 paragraph (1) of this subsection.
274 (c) When a rate filing of an insurer required under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this
275 Code section is not accompanied by the information upon which the insurer supports the
276 filing and the Commissioner does not have sufficient information to determine whether the
H. B. 733
- 11 -

25 LC 52 0818
277 filing meets the requirements of this chapter, then the Commissioner shall request in
278 writing, within 20 days of the date he or she receives the filing, the specifics of such
279 additional information as he or she requires, and the insurer shall be required to furnish
280 such information, and in such event the 45 60 day period provided for in paragraph (1) of
281 subsection (b) of this Code section shall commence as of the date such information is
282 furnished.
283 (d) Any domestic, foreign, or alien insurer that is authorized to write insurance in this state
284 must shall file with the Commissioner any rate, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting
285 rule at least 45 60 days prior to any indicated effective date for all insurance other than
286 personal private passenger motor vehicle insurance. No rate, rating plan, rating system, or
287 underwriting rule required to be filed under this subsection will become effective, nor may
288 any premium be collected by any insurer thereunder, unless the filing has been received by
289 the Commissioner in his office not less than 45 60 days prior to its effective date.
290 (e) When a rate filing of an insurer required under subsection (d) of this Code section
291 results in any increase that impacts insurance consumers or policyholders, such insurer
292 shall submit to the Commissioner a detailed actuarial report demonstrating the necessity
293 of the proposed rate increase based on claims trends, risk factors, and financial solvency;
294 a breakdown of administrative expenses, claim costs, and anticipated profit margins; a
295 statement on how the proposed rate increase shall affect policyholders, including families,
296 small businesses, and commercial enterprises in this state; historical past rate changes and
297 corresponding justifications for the preceding five years; and any other documents deemed
298 necessary by the advocate or the Commissioner. When a rate filing of an insurer required
299 under subsection (d) of this Code section results in any overall rate increase of 10 percent
300 or more within any 12 month period, the Commissioner shall order an examination of that
301 insurer to determine the accuracy of the claim reserves, the applicability of the claim
302 reserve practices for the loss data used in support of such filing, and any other component
303 of the rate filing; provided, however, that in the event the overall increase is less than 25
H. B. 733
- 12 -

25 LC 52 0818
304 percent within any 12 month period and the Commissioner affirmatively determines that
305 he or she has sufficient information to evaluate such rate increase and that the cost thereof
306 would not be justified, he or she may waive all or part of such examination. In all other
307 rate filings required under subsection (d) of this Code section, the Commissioner may order
308 an examination of that insurer as provided in this subsection. Such examination shall be
309 conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 2 of this title. Upon notification
310 by the Commissioner of his or her intent to conduct such examination, the insurer shall be
311 prohibited from placing the rates so filed in effect until such examination has been
312 reviewed and certified by the Commissioner as being complete. Such examination, if
313 conducted by the Commissioner, shall be reviewed and certified within 90 days of the date
314 such rate, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting rule is filed; provided, however, that
315 if the Commissioner makes an affirmative finding that the examination may not be
316 completed within the 90 day period, he or she may extend such time for one additional 60
317 day period completed and reviewed by the advocate and the Commissioner has approved
318 or disapproved the rate filing. Any examination required under this Code section shall be
319 conducted in accordance with Chapter 2 of this title.
320 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section, in the event the
321 filing of any rate, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting rule under subsection (d) of
322 this Code section is not necessary, in the judgment of the Commissioner, to accomplish the
323 purposes of this chapter as set forth in Code Section 33-9-1, then the Commissioner may
324 exempt all domestic, foreign, and alien insurers from being required to file such rate, rating
325 plan, rating system, or underwriting rule.
326 (g) Filings required pursuant to this Code section shall be accompanied by a fee or fees as
327 provided in Code Section 33-8-1.
328 (h) All filings related to rate increases shall be made available on the office's public
329 website within ten days of submission, as provided under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of
330 Title 50."
H. B. 733
- 13 -

25 LC 52 0818
331 SECTION 10.
332 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-9-21.2, relating to
333 petition for hearing by aggrieved insurer, as follows:
334 "33-9-21.2.
335 (a) The Commissioner shall only approve a proposed rate, rating plan, rating system, or
336 underwriting rule that results in an increase if such increase is:
337 (1) Supported by clear and compelling data;
338 (2) Necessary to ensure the insurer's financial stability; and
339 (3) Not excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory to insurance consumers or
340 policyholders.
341 (b) The Commissioner shall disapprove any proposed rate, rating plan, rating system, or
342 underwriting rule that results in an increase that fails to comply with the requirements of
343 this chapter.
344 (c) Any insurer aggrieved by the Commissioner's disapproval of any rate filing may
345 petition the Commissioner for a hearing within ten days of the notification of such
346 disapproval, unless otherwise specifically provided by law. A hearing conducted pursuant
347 to this Code section shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 2 of
348 this title. The insurance consumer and policyholder advocate is authorized to participate
349 in such hearing and in any appeal therefrom."
350 SECTION 11.
351 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-9-26, relating to
352 review of rate, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting rule by insurer or rating
353 organization, as follows:
354 "33-9-26.
355 (a) Any person aggrieved by any rate charged, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting
356 rule followed or adopted by an insurer or rating organization may request the insurer or
H. B. 733
- 14 -

25 LC 52 0818
357 rating organization to review the manner in which the rate, plan, system, or rule has been
358 applied with respect to insurance afforded him. The request may be made by his
359 authorized representative and shall be written. If the request is not granted within 30 days
360 after it is made, the requestor may treat it as rejected.
361 (b) Any person aggrieved by any rate charged, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting
362 rule followed or adopted by an insurer or rating organization or the action of an insurer or
363 rating organization in refusing the review requested or in failing or refusing to grant all or
364 part of the relief requested may file a written complaint and request for hearing with the
365 Commissioner, specifying the grounds relied upon.
366 (c) The insurance consumer and policyholder advocate shall review and investigate any
367 written complaint as provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section and, on his or her
368 own initiative, may review and investigate any rate, rating plan, rating system, or
369 underwriting rule proposed, followed, or adopted by an insurer or rating organization. If
370 the Commissioner has information concerning a similar complaint, he may deny the
371 hearing. If he believes that probable cause for the complaint does not exist or that the
372 complaint is not made in good faith, he shall deny the hearing. Otherwise, and if he
373 (d) If the advocate finds that the complaint charges a violation of this chapter and that the
374 complainant would be aggrieved if the violation is proven, he or if the advocate finds a
375 violation of this chapter based on his or her investigation, the advocate shall request a
376 hearing before the Commissioner and such complaint shall proceed as provided in Code
377 Section 33-9-27."
378 SECTION 12.
379 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 33-9-28, relating to
380 conduct of hearing by Commissioner upon failure to correct noncompliance, notice of
381 hearing, and matters considered at hearing, as follows:
H. B. 733
- 15 -

25 LC 52 0818
382 "33-9-28.
383 If the Commissioner has good cause to believe the noncompliance to be willful, or, if
384 within the period prescribed by the Commissioner in the notice required by Code
385 Section 33-9-27, the insurer, organization, group, or association does not make the changes
386 necessary to correct the noncompliance specified by the Commissioner or establish to the
387 satisfaction of the Commissioner that the specified noncompliance does not exist, then the
388 Commissioner may hold a public hearing in connection with the noncompliance, provided
389 that within a reasonable period of time, which shall be not less than ten days before the date
390 of the hearing, he shall mail written notice specifying the matters to be considered at the
391 hearing to the insurer, organization, group, or association. If no notice has been given as
392 provided in Code Section 33-9-27, the notice provided for in this Code section shall state
393 to the extent practicable in what manner such noncompliance is alleged to exist. The
394 hearing shall not include any additional subjects not specified in the notices required by
395 Code Section 33-9-27 or this Code section. The insurance consumer and policyholder
396 advocate shall represent the interests of insurance consumers and policyholders before the
397 Commissioner."
398 SECTION 13.
399 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all policies issued,
400 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after such date.
401 SECTION 14.
402 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 733
- 16 -